Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB329.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 407.440 is amended to read as follows:
(1) If the[ Office of the] Attorney General or his or her[its] authorized representative is
of the opinion that a support order is erroneous and presents a question of law
warranting an appeal in the public interest, the[ Office of the] Attorney General
may perfect an appeal:
(a) To the proper appellate court in this state if the support order was issued by a
court of this state:[,] or
(b) If the support order was issued in another state, cause the appeal to be taken in
the other state.
(2) In any appeal under this section[either case], expenses of the appeal may be paid
on the order of the Attorney General from funds appropriated for his or her office.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 3/2/2026 8:46 AM Jacketed